Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX C or      ebanturve       or        
SFX C or      ar              or        
SFX C or      arque           or        
SFX C or      arne            or        
SFX C or      arve            or        
SFX C or      eris            or        
SFX C or      erisque         or        
SFX C or      erisne          or        
SFX C or      erisve          or        
SFX C or      etur            or        
SFX C or      eturque         or        
SFX C or      eturne          or        
SFX C or      eturve          or        
SFX C or      emur            or        
SFX C or      emurque         or        
SFX C or      emurne          or        
SFX C or      emurve          or        
SFX C or      emini           or        
SFX C or      eminique        or        
SFX C or      eminine         or        
SFX C or      eminive         or        
SFX C or      entur           or        
SFX C or      enturque        or        
SFX C or      enturne         or        
SFX C or      enturve         or        
SFX C or      aris            or        
SFX C or      arisque         or        
SFX C or      arisne          or        
SFX C or      arisve          or        
SFX C or      atur            or        
SFX C or      aturque         or        
SFX C or      aturne          or        
SFX C or      aturve          or        
SFX C or      amur            or        
SFX C or      amurque         or        
SFX C or      amurne          or        
SFX C or      amurve          or        
SFX C or      amini           or        
SFX C or      aminique        or        
SFX C or      aminine         or        
SFX C or      aminive         or        
SFX C or      antur           or        
SFX C or      anturque        or        
SFX C or      anturne         or        
SFX C or      anturve         or        
SFX C or      rer             or        
SFX C or      rerque          or        
SFX C or      rerne           or        
SFX C or      rerve           or        
SFX C or      reris           or        
SFX C or      rerisque        or        
SFX C or      rerisne         or        
SFX C or      rerisve         or        
SFX C or      retur           or        
SFX C or      returque        or        
SFX C or      returne         or        
SFX C or      returve         or        
SFX C or      remur           or        
SFX C or      remurque        or        
SFX C or      remurne         or        
SFX C or      remurve         or        
SFX C or      remini          or        
SFX C or      reminique       or        
SFX C or      reminine        or        
SFX C or      reminive        or        
SFX C or      rentur          or        
SFX C or      renturque       or        
SFX C or      renturne        or        
SFX C or      renturve        or        
SFX C or      re              or        
SFX C or      reque           or        
SFX C or      rene            or        
SFX C or      reve            or        
SFX C or      ri              or        
SFX C or      rique           or        
SFX C or      rine            or        
SFX C or      rive            or        
SFX C or      endus           or        
SFX C or      endusque        or        
SFX C or      endusne         or        
SFX C or      endusve         or        
SFX C or      ende            or        
SFX C or      endeque         or        
SFX C or      endene          or        
SFX C or      endeve          or        
SFX C or      endum           or        
SFX C or      endumque        or        
SFX C or      endumne         or        
SFX C or      endumve         or        
SFX C or      endi            or        
SFX C or      endique         or        
SFX C or      endine          or        
SFX C or      endive          or        
SFX C or      endo            or        
SFX C or      endoque         or        
SFX C or      endone          or        
SFX C or      endove          or        
SFX C or      enda            or        
SFX C or      endaque         or        
SFX C or      endane          or        
SFX C or      endave          or        
SFX C or      endam           or        
SFX C or      endamque        or        
SFX C or      endamne         or        
SFX C or      endamve         or        
SFX C or      endae           or        
SFX C or      endaeque        or        
SFX C or      endaene         or        
SFX C or      endaeve         or        
SFX C or      endos           or        
SFX C or      endosque        or        
SFX C or      endosne         or        
SFX C or      endosve         or        
SFX C or      endorum         or        
SFX C or      endorumque      or        
SFX C or      endorumne       or        
SFX C or      endorumve       or        
SFX C or      endis           or        
SFX C or      endisque        or        
SFX C or      endisne         or        
SFX C or      endisve         or        
SFX C or      endas           or        
SFX C or      endasque        or        
SFX C or      endasne         or        
SFX C or      endasve         or        
SFX C or      endarum         or        
SFX C or      endarumque      or        
SFX C or      endarumne       or        
SFX C or      endarumve       or        
SFX C or      ens             or        
SFX C or      ensque          or        
SFX C or      ensne           or        
SFX C or      ensve           or        
SFX C or      entem           or        
SFX C or      entemque        or        
SFX C or      entemne         or        
SFX C or      entemve         or        
SFX C or      entis           or        
SFX C or      entisque        or        
SFX C or      entisne         or        
SFX C or      entisve         or        
SFX C or      enti            or        
SFX C or      entique         or        
SFX C or      entine          or        
SFX C or      entive          or        
SFX C or      ente            or        
SFX C or      enteque         or        
SFX C or      entene          or        
SFX C or      enteve          or        
SFX C or      entes           or        
SFX C or      entesque        or        
SFX C or      entesne         or        
SFX C or      entesve         or        
SFX C or      entium          or        
SFX C or      entiumque       or        
SFX C or      entiumne        or        
SFX C or      entiumve        or        
SFX C or      entibus         or        
SFX C or      entibusque      or        
SFX C or      entibusne       or        
SFX C or      entibusve       or        
SFX C or      entia           or        
SFX C or      entiaque        or        
SFX C or      entiane         or        
SFX C or      entiave         or        
